Alabama, session 2026rs, HB372.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The Commissioner of Insurance, in
conformance with Section 36-26-10, Code of Alabama 1975, may
employ personnel to operate the Pharmacy Benefits Manager
Division within the Department of Insurance, including two
employees who are in the exempt service and not subject to the
state Merit System. These positions are in addition to any
other exempt position otherwise authorized by law for the
department. The compensation of these employees shall be set
by the commissioner.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB372 Enrolled









________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 26-Feb-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 09-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2